Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 15. Youth Health Risk Behavior Survey.

§ 32.1-73.8.
Youth health risk behavior survey.

The Department shall, in cooperation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, develop and administer a survey of students to facilitate planning and implementation of effective programs for the prevention of substance abuse through collection of data and information to (i) identify trends in the use of alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs and (ii) assess the prevalence of risk and protective factors among the youth of the Commonwealth. In developing such survey, the Department may utilize all or part of an existing survey designed to collect such information developed by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The survey shall be anonymous and administered in a manner designed to protect students’ privacy. Schools shall be randomly selected for participation in the survey. Schools selected to participate in the survey shall notify students and parents pursuant to § 22.1-79.3. A student whose parents have refused to consent to the student’s participation in the survey as provided in § 22.1-79.3 shall not be required to participate in the survey.

History.

2011, c. 726.